District of Columbia statutes.
00a7Repealed00a7
9-1217.26
00a7
Procedures; appropriations.
00a7
Repealed.
00a700a7
History
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 721, 30 DCR 14800a7
Prior Codifications
00a71981 Ed., §§ 7-215, 7-216.00a700a700a7
00a7